Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,165
Notice of
claim to debtor; contents.

The Department of Health and
Human Services shall send notification to the debtor of the assertion of the
department's rights, or of the rights of an individual not eligible as a public
assistance recipient, to all or a portion of the debtor's income tax refund.
The notice shall contain the procedures available to the debtor for protesting
the offset, the debtor's opportunity to give written notice of intent to contest
the validity of the claim before the department within thirty days of the
date of mailing the notice, and the defenses the debtor may raise. The debt
shall be certified by the department through a preoffset review.

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 11;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 802;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 203;

Laws 2010, LB849, § 29.